Utah statutes.
17-27a-302.   Planning commission powers and duties.
(1)  Each countywide or township planning commission shall, with respect to
the unincorporated area of the county, or the township, make a recommendation
to the county legislative body for:
(a)  a general plan and amendments to the general plan;
(b)  land use ordinances, zoning maps, official maps, and amendments;
(c)  an appropriate delegation of power to at least one designated land use
authority to hear and act on a land use application;
(d)  an appropriate delegation of power to at least one appeal authority to
hear and act on an appeal from a decision of the land use authority; and
(e)  application processes that:
(i)  may include a designation of routine land use matters that, upon
application and proper notice, will receive informal streamlined review and
action if the application is uncontested; and
(ii)  shall protect the right of each:
(A)  applicant and third party to require formal consideration of any
application by a land use authority;
(B)  applicant, adversely affected party, or county officer or employee to
appeal a land use authority's decision to a separate appeal authority; and
(C)  participant to be heard in each public hearing on a contested
application.
(2)  The planning commission of a township under this part may recommend to
the legislative body of the county in which the township is located:
(a)  that the legislative body support or oppose a proposed incorporation of
an area located within the township, as provided in Subsection 10-2-105(4); or
(b)  that the legislative body file a protest to a proposed annexation of an
area located within the township, as provided in Subsection 10-2-407(1)(b).
